Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-217
Auctions; licensing; regulation.

A city of the primary class shall have the power to regulate, license, or prohibit the sale of domestic animals, goods, wares, and merchandise at public auction in the streets, alleys, highways, or any public grounds within the city and to regulate or license the auctioneering of goods, wares, and merchandise.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXI, p. 133;

R.S.1913, § 4431;

C.S.1922, § 3815;

C.S.1929, § 15-218;

R.S.1943, § 15-217;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 74;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 34.
November 14, 2020